Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General

§ 29-1-1.
Purchase of land by state; title to land acquired with state funds as under name of state; sale of public lands; gift or donation of land to state; Secretary of State to sign conveyances; inventory of state lands; land purchased for benefit of state agency; use of assets of Public Employees’ Retirement System restricted; cultural resources survey; land acquired for highways, through federal funds or for the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority projects exempt; recovery of expenses for record-keeping; requirements for certain legislatively authorized conveyances of specifically described real property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (7), (8), (9) and (13) of this section, the title to all lands held by any agency of the State of Mississippi shall appear on all deeds and land records under the name of the “State of Mississippi.” A deed may also recite the name of the agency for whose benefit and use the land is acquired, but the recital shall not be deemed or construed to be a limitation on the grant or an impairment of title held by the State of Mississippi. Use and possession of the land may be reassigned by act of the Legislature or by interagency conveyance where each agency has statutory authority to acquire and dispose of land. For the purpose of this section, the term “agency” shall be defined as set forth in Section 31-7-1(a). The provisions of this section shall not affect the authority of any agency to use any land held by the agency. No assets or property of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall be transferred in violation of Section 272A of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890. Each state agency shall inventory any state-held lands which are titled in the name of the agency. The agency shall execute quitclaim deeds and any other necessary documents to transfer the name and title of the property to the State of Mississippi. State agencies shall furnish to the Secretary of State certified copies of the quitclaim deeds and all other deeds whereby the state agency acquires or disposes of state-held land.

The Secretary of State, under the general direction of the Governor and as authorized by law, shall sell and convey the public lands in the manner and on the terms provided herein for the several classes thereof; he shall perform all the administrative and executive duties appertaining to the selection, location, surveying, platting, listing, and registering these lands or otherwise concerning them; and he shall investigate the status of the various “percent” funds accrued and accruing to the state from the sale of lands by the United States, and shall collect and pay the funds into the Treasury in the manner provided by law. The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, acting on behalf of the state, may accept gifts or donations of land to the State of Mississippi.

In accordance with Sections 7-11-11 and 7-11-13, the Secretary of State shall be required to sign all conveyances of all state-held land. For purposes of this section, the term “conveyance” shall mean any sale or purchase of land by the State of Mississippi for use by any agency, board or commission thereof. Failure to obtain legislative approval pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and the signature of the Secretary of State on any conveyance regarding the sale or purchase of lands for the state including any agency, board or commission thereof, shall render the attempted sale or purchase of the lands void. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any state agency, board, commission or public official to convey any state-held land unless this authority is otherwise granted by law. The Secretary of State shall not withhold arbitrarily his signature from any purchase or sale authorized by the Mississippi State Legislature. Except for those lands forfeited to the state for the nonpayment of taxes, conveyed to another state agency or entity as provided in subsection (11) of this section or acquired by the Mississippi Transportation Commission under Section 65-1-123, no state-held land shall be sold for less than the fair market value as determined by two (2) professional appraisers selected by the State Department of Finance and Administration, who are certified general appraisers of the State of Mississippi. The proceeds from any sale by an agency, board, commission or public official of state-held lands shall be deposited into the State General Fund unless otherwise provided by law.

Before any state-held land is sold to any individual or private entity, thirty (30) days’ advance notice of the intended sale shall be provided by the Secretary of State to the State Legislature and to all state agencies for the purpose of ascertaining whether an agency has a need for the land and for the purpose of ascertaining whether the sale of the land was authorized by law. If no agency of the state expresses in writing to the Secretary of State by the end of the thirty-day period a desire to use the land, then the Secretary of State, with the prior approval of the Mississippi Legislature to sell the state-held land, may offer the land for sale to any individual or private entity. Such notice to state agencies is given in aid of internal management of the real property inventory of the state, and this notice requirement shall not be applied to challenge or defeat any title heretofore or hereafter granted by the state under any law authorized by the Mississippi Legislature providing for the sale or disposal of property.

A cultural resources survey may be performed on any state-held land before the disposition of the land if the Mississippi Department of Archives and History deems this survey necessary. The cost of the survey and any archaeological studies deemed necessary by the Mississippi Department of Archives and History shall be paid by the selling agency and recouped from the proceeds of the sale.

Before any land may be purchased by the state for the benefit of any state agency, the Secretary of State, or his designee, shall search and examine all state land records to determine whether the state owns any land that may fit the particular need of the agency. The Secretary of State, or his designee, shall notify the agency if it is determined that any state-held land is available for use by the agency. The agency shall determine if such land accommodates its needs and shall determine whether to make an official request to the proper authorities to have the use of the land.

This section shall not apply to: (a) any lands purchased or acquired for construction and maintenance of highways or highway rights-of-way by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, or (b) any lands acquired by the state by forfeiture for nonpayment of ad valorem taxes and heretofore or hereafter sold under authority of any other section of Chapter 1, Title 29, specifically relating to tax-forfeited lands.

This section shall not apply to any lands purchased solely by the use of federal funds or lands for which authority to transfer or dispose of these lands is governed by federal law or federal regulations insofar as the application of this section limits or impairs the ability of the Secretary of State to acquire or dispose of the land. However, any state agency acquiring or disposing of land exempted from the application of this section by this subsection shall furnish the Secretary of State certified copies of all deeds executed for those transfers or disposals.

Any lands purchased by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority for a “project” as defined in Section 57-75-5 shall be excluded from the provisions of this section.

The Secretary of State may recover from any agency, corporation, board, commission, entity or individual any cost that is incurred by his office for the record-keeping responsibilities regarding the sale or purchase of any state-held lands.

Subsections (4), (5) and (6) of this section shall not apply to sales or purchases of land when the Legislature expressly authorizes or directs a state agency to sell, purchase or lease-purchase a specifically described property. However, when the Legislature authorizes a state agency to sell or otherwise convey specifically described real property to another state agency or other entity such as a county, municipality, economic development district created under Section 19-5-99 or similar entity, without providing that the conveyance may not be made for less than the fair market value of the property, then the state agency authorized to convey such property must make the following determinations before conveying the property:

That the state agency or other entity to which the proposed conveyance is to be made has an immediate need for the property;

That there are quantifiable benefits that will inure to the state agency or other entity to which the proposed conveyance is to be made which outweigh any quantifiable costs to the state agency authorized to make the conveyance; and

That the state agency or other entity to which the proposed conveyance is to be made lacks available funds to pay fair market value for the property. If the state agency authorized to convey such property fails to make such determinations, then it shall not convey the property for less than the fair market value of the property.

This section shall not apply to the donation and conveyance of the Nanih Waiya State Park to the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians.

This section shall not apply to any lands acquired, sold, or leased pursuant to Section 59-5-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2568; 1906, § 2906; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5241; 1930, § 6012; 1942, § 4094; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 516, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 310, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 29-1-3.
Sixteenth section or in lieu lands; biennial report of commissioner; public officials to supply management and investment information.

The land commissioner has a supervisory power over sixteenth section lands or lands granted in lieu thereof; and he shall supply to the members of the legislature, the boards of supervisors, the boards of education and other interested persons information concerning those lands and make such recommendations and suggestions as he may deem proper.

The land commissioner shall prepare a biennial report which shall include the terms of all leases on sixteenth section school lands, or lands granted in lieu thereof, the condition of the title to all such lands and the current income from all sources earned by such lands, and he shall maintain such report in his office for examination by any interested person.

Any state, county or municipal official shall supply annually to the state land commissioner such sixteenth section management information as shall be requested by the commissioner. Such information shall include, but not be limited to, the following items pertaining to all new leases, rights of way, easements and sales of school trust lands: the number of acres in each parcel; the consideration paid for each transaction; the length and expiration of each lease, easement, or right of way; and the use to be made of each parcel. The applicable public official shall likewise report information requested by the state land commissioner upon principal fund investments. Such information shall include, but not be limited to, the following items: amounts of monies invested; dates of investment; where invested; form of investment; rate of return of each investment; and the amount of revenue earned upon each investment.

The action of mandamus shall lie as is provided under Section 29-3-9 to compel the transmittal of information under this subsection by any public official to the best of his knowledge and belief.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2577; 1906, § 2915; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5250; 1930, § 6033; 1942, § 4122; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-1-5.
Value of state lands.

Whenever the state land commissioner shall need information as to the value of any lands belonging to or claimed by the state, whether the title thereto shall have been acquired by tax sale or otherwise, it shall be the duty of the county tax collector and the county assessor, in response to written inquiry by the state land commissioner, to make written certificate as to the value of such land and the improvements thereon, if any, to the best of their knowledge and belief.

Any assessor or tax collector failing to prepare and mail said certificates shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be fined in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00) or be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding ten (10) days, or be punished by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. §§ 5286a, 5286b; 1930, §§ 6039, 6040; 1942, §§ 4136, 4137; Laws, 1918, ch. 222.

§ 29-1-7.
Suits for or on behalf of public lands.

The land commissioner may prosecute suits in the name of the state, concerning the public lands, through the attorney general, a district attorney, or some attorney at law employed by him for that purpose, with the consent of the governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2565; 1906, § 2903; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5238; 1930, § 6019; 1942, § 4101.

§ 29-1-9.
Suits for recovery of lands.

The land commissioner shall institute and prosecute, and prosecute where already instituted, all necessary suits to cancel patents to lands fraudulently obtained or issued, and to recover the possession of the land; and may, when ordered by the court, make any tender in any suit as well after as before suit is begun.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2587; 1906, § 2926: Hemingway’s 1917, § 5261; 1930, § 6020; 1942, § 4102.

§ 29-1-11.
Fraudulent purchases declared void.

All fraudulent purchases of public lands heretofore made are void, excepting the rights of innocent purchasers without notice; and moneys and fees paid in furtherance of any such fraudulent purchase are forfeited to the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2586; 1906, § 2925; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5260; 1930, § 6028; 1942, § 4110.

§ 29-1-13.
Private claims to lands.

The land commissioner shall investigate all claims of persons to any of the public lands, and shall cause the necessary suits to be instituted and prosecuted, and all pending suits to be prosecuted, to settle controversies concerning them. In all such suits, his findings and report, made upon investigation, shall be prima facie correct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2571; 1906, § 2909; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5244; 1930, § 6021; 1942, § 4103.

§ 29-1-15.
Counties and municipalities may grant lands to state.

The governing authorities of any county or municipality of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to convey lands to the State of Mississippi for hospitals and other public purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3975.5; Laws, 1954 Ex. Ch. 32, §§ 1-3, eff upon passage, approved Sept. 28, 1954.

§ 29-1-17.
Protection of public lands from trespass.

It is the duty of the land commissioner to see that trespasses be not committed on the public lands; and for that purpose he may cause all necessary inquiries and investigations to be made. He shall cause the proper suits to be instituted and prosecuted for the recovery of possession of any public land adversely held by any person, and for damages against any person trespassing thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2589; 1906, § 2930; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5265; 1930, § 6022; 1942, § 4104.

§ 29-1-19.
Damages for trespass.

If any person go or be upon any public land, and cut, fell, or otherwise injure any tree thereon or commit any other trespass on such land, the damages for such trespass shall not be assessed at less than the sum of two dollars ($2.00) per acre for each acre in every subdivision of forty (40) acres of land upon which any trespass was committed by the defendant, besides the statutory damages prescribed for trespass committed as to any tree or timber thereon. All such damages may be recovered in one (1) and the same action, and the secretary of state may institute suits for the recovery of any timber taken contrary to law; but this shall not apply to a person renting public land and having the license of the secretary of state to take trees or timber from contiguous woodland for fuel and the like.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2590; 1906, § 2931; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5266; 1930, § 6023; 1942, § 4105; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 19, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 29-1-21.
Record of tax lands.

The Secretary of State, on receiving from the chancery clerk the list of unredeemed lands sold to the state for taxes, shall enter the same in the register of tax lands by counties and in the regular order of townships, ranges and sections; and if the description of any of the lands be indefinite or defective and need to be made good by reference to the assessment roll under which it was sold, the Secretary of State may add to the description such alternative description as will clearly designate the land, prefacing the same with words “being as appears by the assessment roll of said county, for the year_______________ .”The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may sell the tax lands in the manner provided in this chapter, at such prices and under such terms and conditions as the Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor may fix, subject to the limitations imposed in this chapter, or the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may transfer any of the tax lands to any other state agency, county, municipality or political subdivision of the state.Such agency or subdivision then may retain or dispose of those lands as provided by law.If a state agency, county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, has applied for transfer or purchase of the tax lands, it shall have priority over all other applicants except the original owner, his heirs or assigns.The courts shall not recognize claims by the original owner, his heirs or assigns after unredeemed lands are sold to the state for taxes and received by the Secretary of State’s office or conveyed to a state agency, county, municipality or other political subdivision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4071; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1994, ch. 583, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 415, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 29-1-23.
Definition.

Wherever the words “original owner” appear in this chapter, they shall be construed to mean the owner of the title on date of sale of land for taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4075; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-25.
Lands acquired through error.

In cases where lands have passed from the ownership of individuals into that of the state by some mistake, oversight, or unintentional default, the land commissioner, with the approval of the governor and the attorney general, upon satisfactory proof shall, provided said lands are then held by the state, reconvey such lands to their original owners or to those claiming through the original owners upon payment of all taxes, damages, and costs accrued, on such equitable terms as may be agreed upon in each case by the owner and the land commissioner.

In cases where the owners of land have, through mistake, permitted the same to be sold for taxes, and afterwards, to protect their titles, have repurchased from the land commissioner at the price fixed by law the land so forfeited, the state shall, upon satisfactory proof of said facts with the written approval of the governor and the attorney general, refund said purchase money less the amount of taxes, costs, and damages; and the land commissioner shall make a report of such facts to the next session of the legislature and ask an appropriation therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4071, 4072; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1946, ch. 195.

§ 29-1-27.
Lands mistakenly claimed by state stricken from tax list.

The land commissioner and auditor are hereby authorized to report to the attorney general any lands that may now or hereafter be claimed by the state on their respective records, the title to which is in doubt, and the attorney general shall make an investigation into the subject matter. If in his opinion the state has no title to said land, he shall so notify the auditor or land commissioner, who shall strike such land from the record in his office and notify, with certified lists of lands so stricken off, the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county in which such land is situated. The clerk shall report said land to the board of supervisors for new assessment or, if the land be vacant, state, or United States land, the board of supervisors shall have it stricken from the tax sales list in his office, and the tax collector shall be credited as in erroneous assessments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3859; 1906, § 2946; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5281; 1930, § 6047; 1942, § 4144; Laws, 1942, ch. 235.

§ 29-1-29.
Lands mistakenly sold to state may be stricken.

The chancery clerk of any county is hereby authorized to report to the attorney general any lands that have been or may hereafter be sold to the state for delinquent taxes, the validity of which sale is in doubt, and the attorney general shall make an investigation into the subject matter. If in his opinion such sale of said land is void, he shall so notify such chancery clerk in writing, and the said clerk shall strike such land from the list of lands sold to the state of record in his office, and shall report said land to the board of supervisors for a new assessment if the assessment is invalid, or for an order for resale if the assessment is valid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4145; Laws, 1942, ch. 235.

§ 29-1-31.
Void tax sales stricken.

In all cases where it appears that the claim of title of the state to the lands on the records of the land office is void on account of uncertain description, or was acquired under tax sales which were void and which passed no title to the state, the land commissioner, with the written approval of the attorney general, is hereby authorized and directed to strike such lands from the lists in his office of lands sold to the state for delinquent taxes. The land commissioner shall transmit a list of the lands thus stricken from the records of forfeited state tax lands in his office to the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which such lands are situated, and the clerk of the chancery court shall note the same on the recorded lists in his office and shall file and preserve the list of lands thus stricken from the records in his office. The land commissioner shall at the same time give written notice to the assessor of the county that such lands have been stricken from the lists of lands held by the state for the nonpayment of taxes, and it shall be the duty of the assessor to assess such lands for taxes for the proper year or years at such valuation as the assessor may deem just. Such assessment shall be made in the manner provided by law for the assessment of property which has escaped taxation for former years. And the tax collector shall collect the taxes on such lands in the manner provided by law. The striking of such lands from the lists of forfeited state tax lands in the land commissioner’s office, as herein provided, shall cancel all title or claim of the state to such lands, except for taxes due thereon at the time of the sale and accruing after the sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2917; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5252; 1930, § 6038; 1942, §§ 4073, 4135; Laws, 1896, ch. 45; Laws, 1936, ch 174.

§ 29-1-33.
Sale price of tax lands.

The land commissioner with the approval of the governor is hereby authorized to sell to any bona fide purchaser any lands which may have been forfeited to the state for the nonpayment of taxes after the time allowed by law for redemption shall have expired, for such price as the land commissioner with the approval of the governor may fix; provided, however, that the minimum price for such forfeited tax land shall be two dollars ($2.00) per acre, except as otherwise provided herein. When the land commissioner has good reason to believe, however, that any of said lands are actually worth more than two dollars ($2.00) per acre, he shall cause a proper investigation to be made for the purpose of ascertaining the actual value of such lands, and such lands shall be sold for such price as the land commissioner with the approval of the governor may fix, provided that such sale price shall not be less than two dollars ($2.00) per acre as aforesaid. The land commissioner may fix different prices for separate tracts of land, but all such prices shall be subject to the approval of the governor.

In cases where it reasonably appears that the actual value of any of said lands is less than two dollars ($2.00) per acre, such lands may be sold by the land commissioner, with the approval of the governor, at a price less than two dollars ($2.00) per acre; provided, however, that in no such case shall such lands be sold for less than the amount of the state, levee board (where the land is situated in a levee district), and county taxes (not including, however, the drainage district tax, if any) for which said lands were sold to the state, plus an amount equal to all penalties, fees, damages, and costs accrued up to and including the date of the sale of such lands to the state.

In selling or contracting for the sale of state forfeited tax lands, it shall not be necessary that the land commissioner include in the sale price of such lands any state, drainage district, county, levee, or municipal taxes, or any special assessment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4078; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1946, ch. 421; Laws, 1952, ch. 428.

§ 29-1-35.
Sale of land after buildings destroyed; factors Secretary of State may consider in determining sales price for land.

Where buildings and improvements situated on tax-forfeited lands have been removed or destroyed by fire, windstorm, or flood, the Secretary of State may, in his discretion, sell the tax-forfeited lands for any amount he may deem reasonable, irrespective of the amount of taxes for which the property was sold to the state. The Secretary of State, in determining the sales price for the land, may take into account the cost of cleanup and removal of debris from destroyed buildings and improvements situated thereon, or may contract with the purchaser for cleanup and removal of debris from destroyed buildings as part of the consideration for sale of the land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4133; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 2012, ch. 339, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 29-1-37.
Application to purchase tax lands.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person desiring to purchase any state-forfeited tax land shall make application in writing to the Secretary of State for the purchase of the land, and shall state in the application:

A correct description of the land sought to be purchased.

The name of the former owner and the name of the person to whom the land was assessed at the time of the tax sale, and the post office address of the former owner and the post office address of the person to whom the land was assessed at the time of the sale, if known to the applicant.

Whether or not the land is occupied at the date of the filing of such application, and the name of the person occupying the land, if any.

The nature and value of the improvements on the land.

The approximate quantity of the merchantable timber on the land, if any.

Any other special information as the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may require.

Each applicationshall be signed by the applicant and shall contain a declaration thatthe statements and information submitted in the application are trueand correct and are made under penalty of perjury. The Secretary ofState may require any additional information with reference to thevalue of the lands, thenature and condition of the buildings and improvements on the lands, and the value of the timberon the lands as he may deemnecessary. The applicationsshall be filed by the Secretary of State in the order in which theyare received. Each application shall be given a serial number andshall be entered on a record book on the day it is received. The recordbook shall show the name of the applicant, the serial number of theapplication, and the county in which the property is situated.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may dispose of any state-forfeited tax land by sealed bids after three (3) weeks’ advertisement in a newspaper in the county in which the land is located.

The Secretary of State may sell state-forfeited tax land by online auction. The Secretary of State may establish procedures and adopt administrative rules for the sale of state-forfeited tax land by online auction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4079; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 1994, ch. 583, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 414, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 309, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 5, 2018).

§ 29-1-39.
Contract for sale of tax lands.

The Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor may contract to sell any state forfeited tax lands, including state lands lying within municipalities, even though said lands may have been subdivided into blocks, lots, divisions, or otherwise and sold to the state by such descriptions. The purchase price required in the contract for the sale of state forfeited tax land shall be the same as that required in direct sale of state forfeited tax lands. In the event the Secretary of State with the approval of the governor shall decide that any state forfeited tax land shall be contracted for sale, the Secretary of State with the approval of the governor shall fix a price for the sale of such lands. Said contract for the sale of such lands shall provide that a part of the purchase price shall be paid in cash, and that the balance of such purchase price shall be paid in equal annual installments extending over a period not to exceed five (5) years, said period to be fixed by the Secretary of State. The purchaser in said contract of sale shall agree that he shall pay all installments of the purchase price and all taxes and special assessments that may become due on said lands during the continuance or life of said contract, that he shall not cut any merchantable timber nor commit any waste of any kind on said land without the written permission of the Secretary of State and that he shall not allow any other person to cut any merchantable timber therefrom or permit any waste of any kind thereon until said purchaser has secured a patent from the state in accordance with his contract of sale. Contracts for sale of state forfeited tax lands shall not be transferred nor assigned without the written consent of the Secretary of State. All applications for contracts of sale shall be made on written forms prepared by the attorney general and approved by the Secretary of State and shall be kept on file in the office of the Secretary of State as public records. At such time as the purchaser shall have paid the entire purchase money under any contract of sale and shall have complied with all of the other provisions of said contract of sale, the Secretary of State shall issue a state land patent as in other cases of the sale of state lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4080; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 20, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 29-1-41.
Unlawful to cut timber until purchase price is paid.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has contracted to purchase any state forfeited tax lands to cut, sell, or dispose of any merchantable timber on said lands before the purchase price has been fully paid and a patent duly executed and delivered as provided in this chapter. Any person who shall cut, sell, or dispose of any merchantable timber on any such lands before the purchase price has been fully paid and a patent duly executed and delivered shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4084; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-43.
Lands under contract for sale taxable.

When any contract for the sale of state forfeited tax lands shall be made, as provided in Section 29-1-39, such lands shall then become taxable in all respects and to the same extent and in like manner as where patents are issued, except that such lands under contract for sale shall not be sold for taxes while the state is the holder of the legal title. It shall be the duty of the land commissioner to give notice in writing to the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the land is situated, and likewise the clerk of the municipality if such land be situated in a municipality, that such land is under contract for sale, giving the name of the purchaser and the price. The chancery clerk, and the municipal clerk where the land is located in a municipality, shall file said notices and enter the land upon the assessment rolls and shall clearly designate that such land is public land which has been contracted for sale. Such land shall thereupon be assessed for taxes as other lands are assessed, and the tax collector of the county, and the municipality where said land is located in a municipality, shall collect the taxes thereon as in cases of additional assessments, as provided by Section 29-1-83, with reference to patents.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4081; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-45.
Cancellation of contract of sale.

If taxes become delinquent on lands which are contracted for sale or on any part thereof, the tax collector shall, within thirty (30) days after such delinquency, certify such fact in writing to the Secretary of State and said tax collector shall neither advertise nor sell such land at a tax sale. If said land should be sold at a tax sale, the sale shall be void as against the state, and the state’s title thereto shall not be affected by said sale. Likewise, if such a tax sale is made, the tax collector shall be liable on his official bond to the purchaser at said sale in the penal sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) plus all actual damages suffered by said purchaser. Within fifteen (15) days after receipt of notice from the tax collector that said lands are delinquent for taxes, or if no notice is given by said tax collector then within thirty (30) days after the Secretary of State ascertains that there is a delinquency in the payment of taxes on said land, the Secretary of State shall cancel the contract of sale and shall, within said period of thirty (30) days, inform the contract purchaser of such cancellation by mail at the post office address contained in the application. The said notice shall be given by registered mail with return receipt requested. The Secretary of State shall likewise immediately notify the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county in which said land is situated of the cancellation and the clerk shall report said action to the board of supervisors of said county, who shall have said land stricken from the assessment roll and also stricken from the tax sale list, if the same is contained thereon. The land shall then be re-entered on the record in the Secretary of State’s office, the former entry of the contract of the purchase shall be marked “canceled” on the Secretary of State’s records, and the land shall become subject to disposition by the Secretary of State in the same manner as if no contract of sale had been made. In case the Secretary of State should fail to give notice of the cancellation of said contract or should fail to cancel said contract within the time stipulated herein, the Secretary of State may cancel and give said notice of cancellation on any subsequent date. If said land is located in a municipality, the acts and duties provided herein to be performed by the clerk of the board of supervisors and the board of supervisors shall be performed in like manner by the municipal clerk and the governing authorities of said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4082; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 21, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 29-1-47.
Purchase price forfeited.

On the cancellation of the contract of sale, as provided in the preceding sections of this chapter, that portion of the purchase price paid by the purchaser shall be forfeited to the state as liquidated damages, and the contract purchaser shall lose all rights which he had under the contract of sale. If any waste has been committed or allowed by the purchaser on said land, said purchaser shall, in addition to the liquidated damages, be liable for all actual damages to said land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4083; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-49.
Tax land may be sold to drainage district.

The land commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized to sell state forfeited tax lands lying within a drainage district to the board of drainage commissioners of such district in the manner provided by Section 51-33-45.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4085; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-51.
Tax land may be sold to municipality.

The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized to sell state forfeited tax lands situated within the corporate limits of a municipality to the governing authorities of such municipality in the manner provided by law. If a municipality makes an application to purchase those lands, the municipality shall have priority over all other applicants except the original owner, his heirs or assigns.

As an alternative method to disposing of tax lands situated within a municipality, the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may transfer those lands to the municipality, which then may retain or dispose of the lands as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4086; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1994, ch. 583, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 29-1-53.
Sale of tax; forfeited improvements.

Where one party owns lands and another owns the improvements thereon, and the lands and improvements are assessed separately and the improvements are sold to the state for nonpayment of taxes, the state land commissioner shall have authority to sell and dispose of said improvements by patent under the same terms and conditions that he may dispose of tax-forfeited lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4129; Laws, 1942, ch. 235.

§ 29-1-55.
Sale of tax-forfeited timber.

Where timber standing on lands is assessed to persons other than those owning the fee title to the lands, and the taxes thereon are not paid and such timber is sold to the state for nonpayment of taxes, the Secretary of State may sell and dispose of such timber rights in the same manner as he may sell and dispose of tax-forfeited lands, and the proceeds received by said Secretary of State for the sale thereof shall be divided between the state, county, levee board, and drainage district as provided by law for the disposition of the proceeds derived from the sale of tax-forfeited lands. The owner in fee of lands may purchase from the state any tax-forfeited timber rights on lands owned by him in fee, regardless of the amount of lands that he may own.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4131; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 1997, ch. 412, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 517, § 4, eff from and after Mar. 30, 2001.